Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Chapter 6. Drainage Projects.
§ 21-343.
Payments into court.

The court may, from time to time, order the petitioners to pay into court, or as the court may direct, such amounts at a flat rate per acre according to the area owned by each within the bounds of the district as may be necessary to pay costs and expenses theretofore accrued, such amount to be repaid from the drainage fund to the petitioners in equal sums as were received together with interest thereon at the rate of six per centum per annum by order of the court when, and if the bonds of the district are sold, or the drainage fund otherwise provided and such order to pay into court when entered, shall have the force and effect of a judgment, and it shall be docketed in the judgment docket of the court of the county in which the petition was filed by the clerk thereof, if not paid within thirty days from the entry of the order. Ten days’ notice, however, shall be given by the clerk to each person affected thereby, of such order of the court.

History.

Code 1919, § 1756; 1926, p. 614.

§ 21-344.
Payment of total costs and expenses.

The total amount of the costs and expenses, or any part thereof may be paid by any person in lieu of assessments against his land with the consent of the board of viewers. If all landowners elect to pay their total assessed costs, upon the request of the board of viewers, the sale of bonds shall not be made.

History.

Code 1919, § 1756; 1926, p. 614; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-345.
Assessment of lands benefited not theretofore included.

If, at any time after the final confirmation of the final report of the board of viewers, and final establishment of the district, the county board of drainage commissioners hereinafter mentioned having jurisdiction over the drainage district, are advised that the lands of any person are benefited by the drainage, such lands not having been included in the district or assessed theretofore on account of the drainage, the board, after giving not less than ten days’ legal notice to such person, shall hear and determine whether any, and if any, what monetary benefit has been received by such person or persons by reason of the drainage, and the amount so ascertained by the county board of drainage commissioners, if any, shall be assessed against the lands of such person, in like manner and collected in the same way as if the lands had been classified, listed and assessed in the original assessment of the lands in the drainage district. Such person shall have the right of appeal, from the findings of the board to the circuit court of the county in which the petition was filed. Such appeal shall be perfected within ten days from the date of the findings of said board, after which time no appeal shall be allowed.

History.

Code 1919, § 1757; 1926, p. 614.

§ 21-346.
Drainage record.

The clerk of the circuit court in which the petition is filed shall provide a suitable book to be known as the drainage record, in which he shall record every petition, motion, order, report, judgment or finding of the court in every drainage transaction that may come before it in such manner as to make a complete and continuous record of the case. Copies of all maps, profiles, minutes of meeting, receipts and other pertinent information are to be furnished by the board of viewers to the clerk of the circuit court and marked by the clerk “official copies,” which shall be kept on file by him in his office, and one other copy shall be pasted or otherwise attached to his record book.

History.

Code 1919, § 1758; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-347.
Board of viewers to operate, manage and administer project.

After the drainage project shall have been declared finally established and the survey and plans therefor approved, the board of viewers for such drainage project shall have full authority to operate, manage and administer the affairs of such drainage project as is provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1919, § 1759; 1926, p. 615; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-348.
Superintendent of construction.

The board of viewers of each drainage project may, if necessary, appoint a competent person as superintendent of construction and shall retain the services of the engineer of the drainage district, or his duly appointed successor in the case of such change having been made, to see that the work be performed according to the plans and specifications. Such engineer and superintendent shall each furnish a bond the cost of which shall be paid by the project and to be approved by and payable to the board of viewers in the penal sum of $10,000 each, conditioned upon the honest and faithful performance of their respective duties.

History.

Code 1919, § 1760; 1926, p. 616; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-349.
Notice of time and place of letting contract; bids.

The board of viewers of each drainage project shall cause notice to be given daily for two consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the county wherein such improvement or a part thereof is located if such there be, or in any newspaper within the geographical bounds of the county and in such additional publications elsewhere as they may deem expedient, of the time and place of letting the work of construction of the improvement, and in such notice they shall specify the security to accompany each bid, the approximate amount of work to be performed and the time fixed for the completion thereof; and, on the date appointed for the letting they, together with the superintendent of construction, or the engineer, shall convene and let to the lowest responsible bidder, either as a whole or in sections, as they may deem the most advantageous for the district, the proposed work.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 616; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-350.
Bond to accompany bid.

No bid shall be entertained that is not accompanied by a bond with sureties in an amount equal to five per centum of the bid or that exceeds the estimated cost of the work to be awarded to a contractor.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 616.

§ 21-351.
Rejection of bid.

The board shall have the right to reject all bids once and advertise again the work, if, in their judgment, the interests of the project will be subserved by so doing, but if, upon the second bidding, all the bids exceed the estimated cost of the work, the bids shall be reported to the court by the board of viewers of each drainage project and the court thereupon, after giving notice to all parties affected in a manner similar to that required before the hearing of the final report, as set out in §

21-337

, shall hear and decide anew the question of finally establishing the district, taking as the basis of cost the lowest responsible bid as reported to it by the board of viewers, and the proceeding thereupon shall be as set forth in §§

21-338

to

21-344

, and if the court anew decides that the value of the benefits of the increased value of the lands will exceed the costs it shall direct the board of viewers to accept the lowest responsible bid, otherwise the petition shall be dismissed at the cost of the petitioners. Cost shall be apportioned among them each according to acreage.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 616; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-352.
Contract and bond of successful bidder.

A successful bidder shall be required to enter into a contract with the board of viewers of each drainage project and to execute a bond for the faithful performance of such contract, with sufficient sureties in favor of the board of viewers for the use and benefit of the levees, or drainage project in an amount equal to twenty-five per centum of the amount of the contract price of the work awarded to him.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 616; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-353.
Superintendent and engineer to act as advisors.

In canvassing bids and letting the contract, the superintendent of construction or the engineer shall act only in an advisory capacity to the board of viewers.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 617; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-354.
Basis of contract; inspection.

The contract shall be based on the plans and specifications submitted by the board of viewers in their final report as confirmed by the court, the original of which shall remain on file in the office of the clerk of the county in which the petition for the district was filed and shall be open to the inspection of all prospective bidders.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 617.

§ 21-355.
Opening bids.

All bids shall be sealed and shall not be opened except under the authority of the board of viewers and on the day theretofore appointed for opening the bids.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 617; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-356.
Correction of report.

The board of viewers of each drainage project shall have power to correct errors and modify the details of the final report, if in their judgment they can increase the efficiency of the drainage plan and afford better drainage to the lands in the district without increasing the estimated cost.

History.

Code 1919, § 1761; 1926, p. 617; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-357.
Monthly estimates.

The superintendent in charge of construction or the engineer shall make monthly estimates of the amount of work done, and shall furnish one copy to the contractor and file the other with the board of viewers and the board shall, within five days after the filing of such estimate, meet and direct the secretary to draw a warrant in favor of such contractor for ninety per centum of the work done, according to the specifications and contract; and upon presentation of such warrant, properly signed by the chairman and secretary, to the treasurer, of the drainage fund he shall pay the amount due thereon. When the work is fully completed and accepted by the superintendent or the engineer, the engineer shall make an estimate for the whole amount due, including amounts withheld on the previous monthly estimates, which shall be paid from the drainage fund, as before provided.

History.

Code 1919, § 1762; 1926, p. 617; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-358.
Failure of contractor.

If any contractor to whom the work or a portion of the work shall have been let shall fail to perform the same according to the terms specified in his contract, action may be had in behalf of the board of viewers against such contractor on his bond in the circuit court for damage sustained by the levee or drainage project and recovery made against such contractor and his sureties. In such an event the work shall be advertised and relet in the same manner as the original letting.

History.

Code 1919, § 1763; 1926, p. 617; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-359.
Highway affected.

Where any public ditch, drain or watercourse established under the provisions of this chapter crosses a public highway, the Department of Transportation shall provide bridges or culverts of adequate capacity to permit the free flow of water. The landowners in the drainage project shall bear the excavation cost for such structures.

Any government installation whether federal, state, county, city or town with runoff or acres draining into such a watershed area will be considered a landowner and shall be assessed on an acreage basis for drainage at the same rate as any other landowner.

History.

Code 1919, § 1764; 1924, p. 107; 1926, p. 617; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-360.
Railroad; damage.

Whenever the board of viewers shall make a survey for the purpose of locating a public levee or drainage project or changing a natural watercourse, and the same would cross the right-of-way of a railroad company it shall be the duty of the board of viewers promptly to notify the railroad company by serving written notice, accompanied by plans and profiles, upon the agent of such company or its lessee or receiver, that they will meet the company’s representative at the place where the proposed ditch, drain, or watercourse crosses the right-of-way of such company, or at such other place as may be agreed upon by the respective parties. The meeting shall not be less than ten days after the service of notice fixing the time of the same, for the purpose of conferring with the railroad company with relation to the place where and the manner in which such improvements shall cross such right-of-way. When the time fixed for such conference shall arrive, unless for good cause more time is agreed upon, it shall be the duty of the board of viewers and the railroad company to agree, if possible, upon the place where and the manner and method in which such improvement shall cross such right-of-way. If, however, the board of viewers and the railroad company cannot agree, the whole matter shall be reported to the court by the board of viewers, and by the court referred to the State Corporation Commission as arbiters. The fact that the railroad company is required by the construction of the improvement to build a new bridge or culvert or to enlarge or strengthen an old one, shall be considered as damages to the railroad company to the extent of the actual cost thereof, as provided in §

21-359

.

History.

Code 1919, § 1765; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-361.
Assessment of benefits to railroads.

The board of viewers shall also assess the benefits that will accrue to the right-of-way of the company by affording better drainage or a better outlet for drainage, as provided in §

21-359

, in the case of highways; but no benefits shall be assessed because of the increase of business that may come to the road because of the construction of the improvement. The benefits shall be assessed as provided in §

21-334

, and it shall be reported by the board of viewers as an assessment, due from the railroad company; and unless the same is paid when due by the company as an assessment, it may be collected in the manner of an ordinary debt in any court having jurisdiction; but the board of viewers of each drainage project shall have the right to enter into contracts with any such railroad company looking to a further assessment by virtue of the benefits received under this chapter.

History.

Code 1919, § 1766; 1926, p. 618; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-362.
Notice to railroad.

The clerk of the circuit court shall have notice served upon the railroad company of the time and place of hearing of the final report of viewers under §

21-361

, and the railroad company shall have the right to file objections to the report, and to appeal from the findings of the court in the same manner as any landowner, as provided in §§

21-292

through

21-361

.

History.

Code 1919, § 1767.

§ 21-363.
Manner of crossing right-of-way; cost.

After the contract is let and the actual construction is commenced, the superintendent in charge of construction shall notify the railroad company of the probable time at which the contractor will be ready to enter upon the right-of-way of the road and construct the work thereon. It shall be the duty of the railroad to send a representative to view the ground with the superintendent of construction, and arrange the exact time at which such work can be most conveniently done. The work shall be so planned and conducted as to interfere in the least possible manner with the business of the railroad; and shall be conducted under the supervision and direction of the representative of the railroad company. However, all work necessary in the roadbed of the railroad company, including all temporary and permanent work, shall be promptly done by the railroad company and paid for from the fund of the drainage project in the same manner as provided in §

21-359

, covering public highways.

History.

Code 1919, § 1768; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-364.
Control and repairs; penalty for injury to construction.

Whenever any improvement constructed under this chapter is completed, it shall be under the control and supervision of the board of viewers of the project in the county in which the petition was filed. It shall be the duty of the board to keep the levee, ditch or watercourse in good repair, and for this purpose they may levy an assessment on the lands benefited by the construction of such improvements in the same manner and in the same proportions as the original assessments were made, and the fund that is collected shall be used for repairing and maintaining the ditch, drain or watercourse in perfect order; but if any repairs are made necessary by the act or negligence of the owner of any land through which such improvement is constructed, or by the act or negligence of his tenants, agents or employees or the same is caused by cattle, hogs, or other stock of the owner, employee, or agent, then the cost thereof shall be assessed and levied against the lands of the owner alone, to be collected by proper suit instituted by the board of viewers.

It shall be unlawful for any person to injure or damage or obstruct or build any bridge, roadway, fence or flood gate in such a way as to injure or damage any levee, ditch, drain, or watercourse constructed or improved under the provisions of this chapter, and any person causing such injury shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof may be fined any sum not exceeding twice the damage for injury done or caused.

History.

Code 1919, § 1769; 1926, p. 618; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-365.
Outlet for lateral drains.

The owner of any land that has been assessed for the construction of any ditch, drain or watercourse as herein provided, shall have the right to use the ditch, drain or watercourse as herein let for lateral drains from the land; and if the land is separated from the ditch, drain or watercourse by the land of another or others, and the owner thereof shall be unable to agree with the other or others as to the terms and conditions on which he may enter their lands and construct the drain or ditch, he may file his ancillary petition to the court in such pending proceeding, and the procedure shall be as now provided by law. When the ditch is constructed it shall become a part of the drainage system, and shall be under the control of the board of viewers and kept in repair by them, as provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1919, § 1770; 1926, p. 619; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-366.
Certification and record of total cost.

After the contract for the work of construction of the improvement has been let, the board of viewers shall ascertain the total cost of the improvement, including damages awarded to be paid to owners of land, all costs of incidental expenses, and including a reasonable attorney’s fee to counsel for petitions for conducting the proceedings on behalf of the petitioners, the amount of such fee to be fixed by the board of viewers and also including an amount sufficient to pay the necessary expenses of maintaining the improvement for a period of three years after the completion of the work of construction, after deducting therefrom any special assessments made against any railroad or highway. Thereupon the board of viewers under the hand of the chairman and secretary of the board, shall certify to the clerk of the circuit court the total cost, ascertained as aforesaid; and the certificate shall forthwith be recorded in the drainage record and open to inspection of any landowner in the district.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 610; 1924, p. 710; 1926, p. 619; 1936, p. 1034; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-367.
Preparation and contents of drainage tax lists.

The board of viewers, with the assistance of the engineer, shall immediately prepare, in duplicate, the assessment rolls, or drainage tax lists, giving thereon the name of the owners of land in the district, so far as can be ascertained from the public records, or, if necessary, from the survey made by the drainage engineer a brief description of the several tracts of land assessed, and the amount of the assessment against each tract of land.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 619; 1936, p. 1034; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-368.
Assessment rolls to provide for bond interest payments.

The first of these assessment rolls shall provide assessments sufficient for the payment of interest on the bond issue to accrue the third year after their issue, and the instalment of principal to fall due at the expiration of the third year after the date of issue, together with such amounts as shall have to be paid for collecting and handling of the same. The second assessment roll shall make like provision for the fourth year; the third for the fifth year; and in like manner for each succeeding year.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 619; 1936, p. 1034.

§ 21-369.
Amount of tax levied.

In each year commencing with the maturity of the bonds, the tax levied shall be 110 per centum of the maturing principal and interest on the bonds, in this manner providing for the payment of maturing principal and interest on the bonds one year in advance.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1034.

§ 21-370.
Application of surplus to reduce assessment for following year.

When the sum actually collected on any such assessment shall be more than sufficient to pay the principal and interest for the next succeeding year, a proper allowance for such surplus shall be made in the following assessment, and the percentage may be reduced accordingly.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1034.

§ 21-371.
Assessment rolls to show time collectible; amount of assessment to depend on benefits.

Each of such assessment rolls shall specify the times when collectible, and be numbered in their order, and the amount assessed against the several tracts of land shall be in accordance with the benefits received, as shown by the classification of ratio of assessments made by the board of reviewers.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-372.
Signing rolls.

These assessment rolls shall be signed by the chairman of the board of viewers and by the secretary of the board.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-373.
Disposition of rolls.

One copy of each of the assessment rolls shall be filed with the drainage record and one copy shall be delivered to the county treasurer, or treasurers of the county or counties in which the lands are located, after the clerk of the circuit court in which the petition was filed has appended thereto an order directing the collection of the assessments, and the clerk is authorized and directed to make and append such order.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-374.
Assessment shall have effect of judgment and constitute lien.

The assessments shall thereupon have the force and effect of a judgment as in the case of state and county taxes. These assessments shall constitute a lien upon the lands assessed with the payment thereof, second only to state, county and district taxes and levies and shall be collected in the same manner by the same officers as the state and county taxes are collected.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 711; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-375.
When assessment due and payable; when delinquent.

The assessments shall be due and payable on the first Monday in September in each year, and if the same shall not be paid in full by the thirty-first day of December following, they shall be delinquent and shall be entered as such by the treasurer of the county in which the lands whereon the assessments are delinquent are located, on his copy of the assessment rolls, which entry shall be notice of the lien of any such delinquent assessment to the same extent as the entry of lands in the delinquent tax books is notice of the lien thereon.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 611; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-376.
Interest from delinquency; penalty.

From the date of delinquency of any assessment it shall bear interest at the legal rate, and a penalty of five per centum of the assessment shall be added thereto.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-377.
Notice of sale of delinquent land.

If any assessment is delinquent for more than a year, the treasurer of the county within which the land assessed lies shall, after the expiration of such year, proceed to sell the land by having notice of such intended sale served on the record owner of the land, if he is a resident of this Commonwealth and his whereabouts herein is known, as process is served in actions at law, by publishing the notice of such sale in a newspaper published or having general circulation in his county, and by posting the notice at the courthouse door; such service, publication and posting shall be not less than thirty days in advance of the date set for the sale. Such publication and posting shall be sufficient notice of the sale to all parties in interest except the owner resident in this Commonwealth. Such notice with the return thereon, if it is served, and the certificate of the treasurer setting forth the date and medium of publication shall be filed by the treasurer in his office.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 620; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-378.
Place of sale when land lies in more than one county.

If the land upon which assessments are delinquent lies in more than one county, the treasurer of each county shall sell the portion lying therein.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-379.
Time of sale of delinquent lands.

The sale of the lands for failure to pay such assessments shall be made at the courthouse door of the county in which the lands are situated, between the hours of 10:00 in the forenoon and 4:00 in the afternoon of the first Monday in February of each year. If for any necessary cause the sale cannot be made on that date, the sale may be continued from day to day for not exceeding four days, or the lands may be readvertised and sold on the first Monday in March succeeding during the same hours without any order therefor. If the county treasurer for any reason fail to make sale of any lands on the first Monday in February or March in any year, he may sell the same upon the first Monday of any subsequent month in the same year or any succeeding year after giving notice as required by law.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 612; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1035.

§ 21-380.
Redemption of delinquent lands sold.

The existing general tax law in force when sales are made for delinquent assessments shall have application in redeeming lands so sold.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1036.

§ 21-381.
Sufficiency of bids at delinquent sales.

No bid at any sale shall be received unless sufficient in amount to discharge all the drainage assessments and other charges due by the delinquent lands or owner thereof, together with all costs and expenses of sale. If no sufficient bid be received, the board of viewers shall be deemed the purchaser at a sum sufficient to pay all assessments which are due, and costs, as above stated, and shall be entitled to receive a certificate of purchase and deed in the manner provided by law for purchases at tax sales. The board of viewers shall only be required to pay the costs and expenses of sale before receiving a certificate of purchase, and no lands shall be subsequently sold for drainage assessments while the board of viewers holds a certificate of purchase or deed therefor.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1036; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-382.
Rights of board of viewers at sale.

The board of viewers shall be in like position and have the same rights and be subject to the same duties as the purchaser of lands at any tax sale under the general law.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1036; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-383.
Who may redeem.

The owner of the lands so sold or any person having an estate therein or having a lien thereon may redeem the same in the manner provided by law; and if the board of viewers shall have been the purchaser of the lands, the amount paid in redemption shall include the sum bid therefor plus the penalty.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1036; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-384.
Board of viewers to pay treasurer.

When the period of redemption has expired the board of viewers shall pay to the treasurer or treasurers of the county or counties in which the lands lie the balance of the amount representing its bid at the sale of the lands and any accumulated assessments on the lands, before it or its assigns shall be entitled to a deed therefor.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1936, p. 1036; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-385.
Effect when board of viewers acquires land at sale.

The board of viewers, after acquiring a deed for such lands, may hold the same as an asset of the project of which the lands are a part, and shall be liable for the payment of all drainage assessments and state and county taxes accruing after the sale at which the district was a bidder, and in all respects be deemed the owner of the lands and subject to the same privileges and liabilities as any other landowner, including the right to convey the lands for a consideration and pay the proceeds of the sale to the county treasurer for the credit of the district, of which such lands are a part, which may be distributed by the board of viewers for the benefit of the district in the same manner as other district funds.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1926, p. 621; 1936, p. 1036; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-386.
Sale and collection according to general law.

The sale of lands for failure to pay such assessments, and the collection of such assessments, except as herein provided, shall be in accordance with general law as to the collection of state and county taxes.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 622; 1936, p. 1037.

§ 21-387.
Deed to purchaser.

If no objection is made in any sale of land within thirty days after the date of sale, and the purchase price has been paid, the clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the land lies shall convey to the purchaser the land sold by special warranty deed receiving therefor the fee provided by law for the conveyance of land sold for delinquent taxes.

Such conveyances shall be indefeasible to the same extent as a conveyance by a special commissioner acting under court appointment, and all persons having actual or constructive notice of the sale shall be precluded by such conveyance from thereafter objecting to the sale.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 622; 1936, p. 1037.

§ 21-388.
Duty of treasurer to make payments of interest and principal of bonds.

It shall be the duty of the treasurer of the county in which the land is located and without any previous order from the board of viewers, out of the amount received by him as aforesaid, to provide and pay the installment of interest at the time and place as evidenced by the coupons attached to the bonds, and also to pay the annual installments of the principal due on the bonds at the time and place as evidenced by the bonds; namely, so far as they affect and are liens by virtue of this chapter, upon the lands in his county, and any county treasurer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, if he shall willfully fail to make prompt payments of the interest and principal upon such bonds, and shall likewise be liable in a civil action for all damages which may accrue either to the board of viewers or the holder of the bonds, to either or both of which a right of action is hereby given.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1920, p. 612; 1924, p. 712; 1926, p. 622; 1936, p. 1037; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-389.
Change of assessment rolls on change of ownership of lands.

If at any time before or after the preparation of the assessment rolls or drainage tax lists the owners of any lands within the boundary of the drainage project, which are liable for assessments or are assessed, should sell the whole or part of the lands, the board of viewers together with the assistance of the drainage engineer of the project, or any other competent drainage engineer, shall so prepare or change the assessment rolls to provide for the change in liability due to the change of ownership of the lands or part thereof. The new owner’s name shall be added to the assessment roll and shall thereafter be liable for the drainage assessment upon that portion of the land purchased.

History.

Code 1919, § 1771; 1924, p. 713; 1926, p. 622; 1936, p. 1037; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-390.
Law governing sales.

Sales of lands for delinquent assessments may be made either under the law which was in force at the time of the creation of the drainage district, or under that in force at the time of sale, as may be deemed by the county treasurer more effectual for the enforcement of the assessments and the protection of the interest of the holders of bonds predicated thereon. Any sales of lands heretofore made under either of such laws are declared valid and effectual.

History.

1927, p. 16; Michie Code 1942, § 1771a.

§ 21-391.
Notice of redemption.

In any case where such sales have heretofore been made, or shall hereafter be made, and the purchaser of such lands desires a deed therefor, the treasurer shall give notice to all persons, who immediately prior to the sale were record owners of the lands, by publication once a week, for four successive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the lands are situated, in which publication the record owners shall be named, informing the owners that they may, within four months after the first publication of the notice, redeem the lands by paying the full amount of all assessments due for the year or years for which the lands were delinquent at the time of sale, together with the full amount of any assessments which may have become due upon the lands before their redemption hereunder, and together with all interest and penalties due upon the several amounts of such assessments.

History.

1927, p. 16; Michie Code 1942, § 1771a.

§ 21-392.
Repayment to purchasers on redemption; deed on failure to redeem.

If any record owner shall redeem the lands, as aforesaid, it shall be the duty of the treasurer to repay to the purchaser at the sale, from the amount so paid in redemption, the amount paid by him for the lands so redeemed, with interest thereon; and thereafter the former owner so redeeming the same shall hold the same discharged from the lien of the assessments so paid by him, but subject to all assessments which may thereafter become due or be made upon the lands; but if the lands be not redeemed within the period, it shall then be the duty of the treasurer to execute and deliver to the purchaser of the lands a good and sufficient deed therefor, with special warranty, in which deed the clerk of the circuit court of the county shall join, and the purchaser shall thereafter hold the lands in fee simple, subject only to assessments thereafter becoming due thereon.

History.

1927, p. 17; Michie Code 1942, § 1771a.

§ 21-393.
Notice of issuance of bonds.

The board of viewers of the county in which the petition was filed shall give notice by publication once a week for three successive weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which the project, or some part thereof, is situated, if there be any such newspaper, and also by posting a written or printed notice at the door of the courthouse and at five conspicuous places in the project, reciting that they propose to issue drainage bonds for the total cost of the improvement, giving the amount of the bonds to be issued, the rate of interest that they are to bear, and the time when payable.

History.

Code 1919, § 1772; 1926, p. 623; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-394.
Payment of full amount by landowner.

Any landowner in the project not wanting to pay interest on the bonds may, within fifteen days after the last publication of the notice, pay to the treasurer of the county in which his land is located the full amount for which his land is liable, to be ascertained from the assessment list, and the certificate of the board of viewers showing the total cost of the improvements, and have his lands released from liability to be assessed for the improvement; but such land shall continue liable for any future assessment for maintenance or for any increased assessment authorized under this chapter.

History.

Code 1919, § 1772; 1926, p. 623; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-395.
Defense; waiver.

Every person owning land in the district who shall neglect or fail to pay to the treasurer of the county in which his land is located the full amount for which his land is liable, within the time above specified, shall be deemed as consenting to the issuance of the drainage bonds, and in consideration of the right to pay his proportion in installments he thereby waives his right of defense to the payment of any assessments which may be levied for the payment of the bonds, because of any irregularity, illegality, or defect in the proceedings prior to such time, except in case of an appeal, as hereinbefore provided, which is not affected by this waiver.

History.

Code 1919, § 1773.

§ 21-396.
Issuing bonds; amount.

At the expiration of fifteen days after publication of notice of bond issue, the board of viewers of the county in which the petition was filed may issue bonds of the drainage project for an amount equal to the total cost of the improvement, including all costs as allowed under the terms of this chapter, less such amounts as shall have been paid in cash to the county treasurer, or treasurers, plus an amount sufficient to pay interest on the bond issue for the three years next following the date of issue.

History.

Code 1919, § 1774; 1920, p. 612; 1926, p. 623; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-397.
Interest and maturity of bonds.

The bonds shall bear not more than six per centum interest per annum payable semiannually, and shall be paid within thirty years, the first installment of principal shall mature at the expiration of three years from the date of issue.

History.

Code 1919, § 1774; 1920, p. 612; 1926, p. 623.

§ 21-398.
Sale of bonds and disposition of proceeds.

The board of viewers, after widely advertising the sale of the bonds in such publications as they deem necessary, may sell the bonds upon the approval of the court or the judge thereof, to the highest bidder, or bidders, and devote the proceeds to the payment for the work as it progresses, and to the payment of the interest on the bonds for the three years next following the date of issue, and to the payment of outstanding indebtedness and the other expenses of the project provided for in this chapter, including a reasonable attorney’s fee to counsel for conducting the proceedings, the amount of such fee to be fixed by the court.

History.

Code 1919, § 1774; 1920, p. 612; 1926, p. 623; 1954, c. 642.

§ 21-399.
Same; records.

The proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds shall be for the exclusive use of the levee or drainage project specified on their face, and the bonds shall be numbered by the board of viewers and recorded in the drainage record, which record shall set out specifically the lands embraced in the project on which the tax has not been paid in full, which land is to be assessed as hereinafter provided.

History.

Code 1919, § 1774; 1920, p. 612; 1926, p. 623; 1954, c. 642.